Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.270

Information in various languages.

In order to encourage the broadest possible voting participation by all eligible citizens, the secretary of state shall produce voter registration information in the various languages required of state agencies.

[ 2023 c 466 s 9; 2003 c 111 s 139; 2001 c 41 s 3. Formerly RCW 29A.04.240, 29.04.085.]